District of Columbia statutes.
47-355.06

Penalties.

An agency head, deputy agency head, agency fiscal officer, agency budget director, agency controller, manager, or other employee may be subject to adverse personnel action, including removal, for violating any provision in § 47-355.02.

History

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-285, § 2, 50 DCR 940
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, §§ 12(a), 77(c), 51 DCR 881
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-293, § 2(e), 54 DCR 1083

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105, in par. (1), validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 16-293, rewrote this section, which formerly read:
“An agency head, deputy agency head, agency chief financial officer, agency budget director, agency controller, manager, or other employee may be subject to adverse personnel action, including removal, for:
“(1) Violating § 47-355.02;
“(2) Allowing an expenditure or obligation to exceed apportioned amounts;
“(3) Not submitting a required plan or projection in a timely manner;
“(4) Knowingly reporting incorrectly on spending to date or on projected total annual spending; or
“(5) Failure to adhere to a spending plan.”